Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-333.01
In Transit, defined.

In Transit means a placard or sticker that authorizes a motor vehicle or trailer that is not registered under the Motor Vehicle Registration Act to be legally operated on highways.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 39.
July 18, 2026